North Dakota, session 69, HB1016.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION. The funds provided in this section, or so much of the funds as may
be necessary, are appropriated out of any moneys in the general fund in the state treasury, not
otherwise appropriated, and from other funds derived from special funds and federal funds, to the office
of the adjutant general for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the office of the adjutant general,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027, as follows:
Subdivision 1.
NATIONAL GUARD
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $7,745,742 ($4,089,855) $3,655,887
New and vacant FTE pool 0 1,943,664 1,943,664
Operating expenses 3,214,211 (1,618,997) 1,595,214
Capital assets 224,046 47,749,954 47,974,000
Grants 470,692 0 470,692
Civil air patrol 330,642 215,254 545,896
Tuition, recruiting, and retention 3,362,235 0 3,362,235
Air guard contract 8,928,725 111,734 9,040,459
Army guard contract 49,586,921 19,080,973 68,667,894
Veterans' cemetery 1,401,147 62,469 1,463,616
Reintegration program 900,634 (900,634) 0
Total all funds $76,164,995 $62,554,562 $138,719,557
Less other funds 58,308,741 59,468,686 117,777,427
Total general fund $17,856,254 $3,085,876 $20,942,130
Subdivision 2.
DEPARTMENT OF EMERGENCY SERVICES
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Salaries and wages $13,562,188 $1,800,194 $15,362,382
New and vacant FTE pool 0 910,777 910,777
Operating expenses 6,815,567 769,316 7,584,883
Capital assets 0 660,000 660,000
Grants 27,790,000 0 27,790,000
Disaster costs 74,249,944 78,761,155 153,011,099
Radio communications 0 1,020,000 1,020,000
Total all funds $122,417,699 $83,921,442 $206,339,141
Less other funds 114,662,611 81,789,583 196,452,194
Total general fund $7,755,088 $2,131,859 $9,886,947
Subdivision 3.

H. B. NO. 1016 - PAGE 2
SECTION 1 TOTAL
Adjustments or
Base Level Enhancements Appropriation
Grand total all funds $198,582,694 $146,476,004 $345,058,698
Less grand total other funds 172,971,352 141,258,269 314,229,621
Grand total general fund $25,611,342 $5,217,735 $30,829,077
Full-time equivalent positions 233.00 2.00 235.00
SECTION 2. ONE-TIME FUNDING - EFFECT ON BASE BUDGET - REPORT TO SEVENTIETH
LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY. The following amounts reflect the one-time funding items included in the
appropriation in section 1 of this Act which are not included in the entity's base budget for the 2027-29
biennium and which each entity shall report to the appropriations committees of the seventieth
legislative assembly regarding the use of this funding:
One-Time Funding Description Other Funds
National guard
Camp Grafton regional training institute $34,000,000
Critical infrastructure state matching funds 4,500,000
Williston readiness center design 2,500,000
Civil air patrol statewide interoperable radio network upgrade 206,426
Line of communication bridge training site 3,674,000
Dickinson readiness center 5,800,000
Camp Grafton fitness facility 2,000,000
Total national guard $52,680,426
Department of emergency services
Safeguarding Tomorrow through Ongoing Risk Mitigation Act $39,050,000
Wildland fires 2,550,000
Disaster response equipment 660,000
Law enforcement redundant switch 525,000
Statewide interoperable radio network costs 495,000
Flood mitigation grants 200,000
Total department of emergency services $43,480,000
Grand total $96,160,426
SECTION 3. NEW AND VACANT FTE POOL - LIMITATION - TRANSFER REQUEST. The adjutant
general may not spend funds appropriated in the new and vacant FTE pool line items in section 1 of
this Act, but may request the office of management and budget to transfer funds from the new and
vacant FTE pool line items to the applicable salaries and wages, civil air patrol, air guard contract, army
guard contract, veterans' cemetery, and disaster costs line items within each subdivision in accordance
with the guidelines and reporting provisions included in House Bill No. 1015, as approved by the sixty-
ninth legislative assembly.
SECTION 4. VETERANS' CEMETERY MAINTENANCE FUND - APPROPRIATION. In addition to
the amount appropriated to the adjutant general in the veterans' cemetery line item in subdivision 1 of
section 1 of this Act, there is appropriated any additional funds that are received and deposited in the
veterans' cemetery maintenance fund pursuant to sections 37-03-14 and 39-04-10 for the operation of
the North Dakota veterans' cemetery for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending June 30,
2027.
SECTION 5. EXEMPTION - MAINTENANCE AND REPAIRS - TRANSFERS. Notwithstanding
section 54-16-04, the director of the office of management and budget shall transfer up to $500,000 of
appropriation authority to the operating expenses and capital assets line items contained in section 1 of
this Act, as requested by the adjutant general during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and ending
June 30, 2027. The adjutant general shall notify the legislative council of any transfers made pursuant
to this section.

H. B. NO. 1016 - PAGE 3
SECTION 6. OTHER FUNDS - STRATEGIC INVESTMENT AND IMPROVEMENTS FUND. The
other funds line item in subdivision 1 of section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $7,206,426 from the
strategic investment and improvements fund, of which $4,500,000 is for critical infrastructure state
matching funds, $2,500,000 is for the Williston readiness center design, and $206,426 is for the civil air
patrol statewide interoperable radio network upgrade. The other funds line item in subdivision 2 of
section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $1,020,000 from the strategic investment and improvements
fund, of which $525,000 is for the state radio law enforcement redundant switch and $495,000 is for
statewide interoperable radio network costs.
SECTION 7. OTHER FUNDS - STATE DISASTER RELIEF FUND. The other funds line item in
subdivision 2 of section 1 of this Act includes the sum of $11,800,703 from the state disaster relief fund,
of which $5,750,703 is for costs related to previous state disasters, $2,000,000 is for natural disaster
response and recovery grants, $3,550,000 is for the ten percent state match for the federal
safeguarding tomorrow through ongoing risk mitigation program, $300,000 is for wildland fire disaster
funding, and $200,000 is for flood mitigation grants.
SECTION 8. GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS - NORTH DAKOTA MILITARY MUSEUM. The
adjutant general may accept gifts, grants, and donations, including those from private and federal
sources, and remit the funding to the state treasurer for deposit in the state historical society gifts and
bequests fund for the construction of a North Dakota military museum during the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027.
SECTION 9. EXEMPTION - UNEXPENDED APPROPRIATIONS. The following appropriations are
not subject to the provisions of section 54-44.1-11 and may be continued into the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027:
1. Any amounts remaining for the construction of the Dickinson readiness center continued in
section 12 of chapter 48 of the 2023 Session Laws appropriated from federal funds in
subdivision 1 of section 1 of chapter 16 of the 2021 Session Laws;
2. Any amounts remaining for the line of communication bridge training site continued in
section 12 of chapter 48 of the 2023 Session Laws appropriated from federal funds in
subdivision 1 of section 1 of chapter 16 of the 2021 Session Laws;
3. The sum of $9,000,000 appropriated from the federal state fiscal recovery fund for the
construction of the Camp Grafton fitness facility in subdivision 1 of section 1 of chapter 48 of
the 2023 Session Laws;
4. The sum of $3,362,235 appropriated from the general fund for tuition assistance, recruiting,
and retention incentives to eligible current and former members of the North Dakota national
guard in subdivision 1 of section 1 of chapter 48 of the 2023 Session Laws, which may be
used for program administration and operating costs;
5. Any amounts remaining for the expansion of Camp Grafton continued in section 12 of
chapter 48 of the 2023 Session Laws appropriated from the national guard training area and
facility development trust fund in section 3 of chapter 16 of the 2021 Session Laws;
6. Any amounts remaining for replacing the state active duty software and maintenance
continued in section 12 of chapter 48 of the 2023 Session Laws appropriated from the federal
state fiscal recovery fund in subsection 24 of section 1 of chapter 550 of the 2021 Special
Session Session Laws;
7. The sum of $314,000 appropriated from the general fund for cybersecurity grants in
subdivision 2 of section 1 of chapter 48 of the 2023 Session Laws; and
8. The sum of $225,000 appropriated from the state disaster relief fund for flood mitigation grants
in subdivision 2 of section 1 of chapter 48 of the 2023 Session Laws.

H. B. NO. 1016 - PAGE 4
SECTION 10. CAMP GRAFTON EXPANSION - LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the sixty-
ninth legislative assembly that the adjutant general contract for the purchase or long-term lease of land
for the Camp Grafton expansion, including the purchase of up to one thousand six hundred acres and
the long-term lease of the remainder, not to exceed six thousand acres in total. The adjutant general
may not use eminent domain for the expansion of Camp Grafton.
SECTION 11. EMERGENCY. The following are declared to be an emergency measure:
1. The sum of $6,000,000 appropriated from the general fund and the strategic investment and
improvements fund for critical infrastructure state matching funds in the army guard contract
line item in subdivision 1 of section 1 of this Act;
2. The sum of $206,426 appropriated from the strategic investment and improvements fund for
the civil air patrol statewide interoperable radio network upgrade in the civil air patrol line item
in subdivision 1 of section 1 of this Act; and
3. The sum of $39,050,000 appropriated from the state disaster relief fund and federal funds for
the Safeguarding Tomorrow through Ongoing Risk Mitigation Act in the disaster costs line item
of subdivision 2 of section 1 of this Act.

H. B. NO. 1016 - PAGE 5
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1016 and that
two-thirds of the members-elect of the House of Representatives voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 83 Nays 6 Absent 5
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that two-thirds of the members-elect of the Senate voted in favor of said law.
Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 0 Absent 1
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State